North Dakota, session 69, HB1238.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 15.1-13-12.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
15.1-13-12.1. Teaching license - Lifetime licensure - Report to the board.
1. If an individual has been licensed to teach in this state for a period of thirtytwenty-five years,
the education standards and practices board shall grant the individual lifetime licensure.
2. Nothing in this section precludes the board from taking any action against an individual's
lifetime license if the board determines that the action is warranted under this chapter.
3. An individual holding a lifetime license who is or intends to be employed as a teacher shall
provide a report to the board at least once every five years. The report:
a. Must be made in the form and manner prescribed by the board.
b. May not cause the individual holding a lifetime license to incur any cost.
c. Must disclose:
(1) Whether the individual has violated a criminal statute since the issuance of the
lifetime license or the last report; and
(2) Any information that may cause the individual's teaching license to be revoked or
suspended.

H. B. NO. 1238 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1238.
House Vote: Yeas 87 Nays 4 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State